District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.75

Retirement benefits for lateral law enforcement officers hired after January 11, 2000.

(a)

For the purposes of retirement benefits, an employee hired as a lateral law enforcement officer pursuant to § 1-610.72 shall elect to be covered by § 1-901.01 et seq. These lateral law enforcement officers shall be treated as new hires for retirement purposes except as provided by law for federal government and military service and except as provided by § 1-610.76.

(b)

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1075
as added Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 102(b), 47 DCR 4619
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 812, 47 DCR 6308
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-194, § 1202, 51 DCR. 9406

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-611.75.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-172 added subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 15-194 repealed subsec. (b) which had read as follows: “(b) Metropolitan Police Officers hired after January 11, 2000, and prior to December 31, 2003, shall have successfully completed at least 60 post-secondary semester hours from an accredited university by the fifth anniversary of the date hired.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Metropolitan Police Department Education Requirement Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-147, April 22, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 4931).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 812(a), (b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 812(b) of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Metropolitan Police Department Educational Requirement Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-323, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1586).